Virginia statutes. Title 30. General Assembly.
Chapter 34. Brown v. Board of Education Scholarship Awards Committee.

§§ 30-226 through 30-231.

Repealed by Acts 2005, cc. 753 and 834, cl. 4, effective March 26, 2005.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to the Brown v. Board of Education Scholarship Program and Fund, see § 30-231.01 et seq.